California statutes. Financial Code
 available to a resident, in a clear and conspicuous manner and in the medium through which the resident contacted the licensee.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to either of the following:

(A) Programs with information that is sensitive to potential security risks, including those programs described in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(B) Any policy or procedure the department previously determined is not subject to this subdivision due to potential security risks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 52, Sec. 10.   (SB 97)   Effective June 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3702.

(a) An applicant, before submitting its application, shall establish and maintain in a record a policy or procedure designed to ensure compliance with this division, and law of this state other than this division, if the other law is relevant to the digital financial asset business activity contemplated by the licensee or the scope of this division or this division could assist in the purpose of the other law because violation of the other law has a remedy under this division.

(b) A policy or procedure under subdivision (a) shall be compatible, and not conflict, with requirements applicable to a licensee under other state law or under federal law and may be a policy
 or procedure in existence for the licensee’s digital financial asset business activity with, or on behalf of, a resident.

(c) After the policies and procedures required under this section are created by the licensee, the licensee shall engage a responsible individual with adequate authority and experience to monitor any policy or procedure, publicize it as appropriate, recommend changes as desirable, and enforce it.

(d) A licensee may request advice from the department regarding compliance with this section and, with the department’s approval, outsource functions, other than compliance, required under this section.

(e) Failure of a particular policy or procedure adopted under this section to meet its goals in a particular
 instance is not a ground for liability of the licensee if the policy or procedure was created, implemented, and monitored properly. Repeated failures of a policy or procedure are evidence that the policy or procedure was not created or implemented properly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Miscellaneous Provisions [3801. - 3801.]

3801.

The provisions of this division are severable. If any provision of this division or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Digital Financial Asset Transaction Kiosks [3901. - 3907.]

3901.

For purposes of this division:

(a) “Charges” means either of the following:

(1) Fees or expenses paid by the customer.

 (2) The difference between the current market price of the digital financial asset on a licensed digital financial asset exchange and the price of the digital financial asset charged to the customer.

(b) (1) “Digital financial asset transaction kiosk” means an electronic information processing device that is capable of accepting or dispensing cash in exchange for a digital
 financial asset.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “cash” means physical United States currency, both coins and paper currency.

(c) “Licensed digital financial asset exchange” means a digital financial asset exchange that is not an operator and has either of the following:

(1) A license to conduct virtual currency business activity in this state or the State of New York pursuant to Part 200 of Title 23 of the New York Codes, Rules and Regulations.

(2) A license pursuant to this division.

(d) “Operator” means a person who owns, operates, or manages a digital financial asset transaction kiosk located in
 this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 871, Sec. 1.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3902.

An operator shall not accept or dispense more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) in a day from or to a customer via a digital financial asset transaction kiosk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 871, Sec. 1.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3904.

On or after January 1, 2025, an operator shall not collect charges, whether direct or indirect, from a customer related to a single digital financial asset transaction that exceed the greater of the following:

(a) Five dollars ($5).

(b) Fifteen percent of the United States dollar equivalent
 of digital financial assets involved in the transaction according to the publicly quoted market price of the digital asset on a licensed digital financial asset exchange at the time the customer initiates the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 871, Sec. 1.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3905.

(a) (1) On or after January 1, 2025, before a digital financial asset transaction, an operator shall provide a written disclosure in English and in the same language principally used by the operator to advertise, solicit, or negotiate with a customer containing the terms and conditions of the transaction, which shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) The amount of a digital financial asset involved in the transaction.

(B) The amount, in United States dollars, of any fees, expenses, and charges collected by the operator.

(C) The United States dollar price of the digital financial asset that is charged to the customer and the United States dollar price of the digital financial asset as listed by a licensed digital financial asset exchange.

(D) If an operator does not provide a method to reverse or refund a transaction, a warning that all transactions are final and cannot be undone.

(2) The disclosure required by this subdivision shall be clear and conspicuous and provided separately from any other disclosure provided by the operator.

(b) An operator shall provide a customer with a receipt for any transaction made at the operator’s digital financial asset transaction kiosk that includes all of the following information:

(1) The name of the customer.

(2) The date and time of the transaction.

(3) The name of the operator.

(4) The amount of a digital financial asset involved in the transaction.

(5) The amount of United States dollars involved in the transaction.

(6) The amount, in United States dollars, of any fees collected by the operator in relation to the
 transaction.

(7) The amount, in United States dollars, of any spread between the United States dollar price of the digital financial asset that is charged to the customer and the United States dollar price of the digital financial asset as listed by a licensed digital financial asset exchange.

(8) The name of the licensed digital financial asset exchange the operator used to calculate the spread described in paragraph (7).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 871, Sec. 1.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3906.

(a) An operator shall provide to the department a list of all locations of digital financial asset transaction kiosks that the operator owns, operates, or manages in this state.

(b) An operator shall provide the department with updates to the list required by this section within 30 days of any changes.

(c) The department shall make the list required by this section for each operator available to the public on the department’s internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 871, Sec. 1.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3907.

(a) On or after July 1, 2026, an operator shall comply with Section 3201 to the extent that the operator engages in digital financial asset business activity.

(b) If an operator does not engage in digital financial asset business activity but allows or facilitates another person to engage in digital financial asset business activity via a digital financial asset transaction kiosk that is owned, operated, or managed by the operator, the operator shall do all of the following:

(1) On or after July 1,
 2026, ensure that the person engaging in digital financial asset business activity via the digital financial asset transaction kiosk has a license pursuant to this division.

(2) Ensure that any charges collected from a customer, whether collected by the operator, a person engaging in digital financial asset business activity via the digital financial asset transaction kiosk, or both, comply with the limits provided by Section 3904.

(3) Comply with all other provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 945, Sec. 6.   (AB 1934)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.3. THE SETTING OF FEES IN CONSUMER CREDIT AGREEMENTS AND RELATED CONSUMER PROTECTIONS [4000. - 4002.]

4000.

(a) For purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Charge cardholder” and “charge card issuer” have the meaning defined in Section 1748.21 of the Civil Code and “charge card” means those cards defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1748.21 of the Civil Code and upon which the full balance is due and payable in each billing cycle.

(2) “Consumer” means a natural person.

(3) “Consumer credit agreement” means any written instrument providing for an extension of unsecured open-end credit for personal, family, or household purposes, that governs the relationship
 between a supervised financial organization and one or more consumers.

(4) “Charge card agreement” means the written instrument that creates and governs the relationship between a charge card issuer and one or more consumers.

(5) “Minimum payment” means that amount of money recited on a billing statement for an open-end credit account that must be received by the supervised financial institution by a specified due date.

(6) “Open-end credit” has the meaning set forth in Section 1026.2(a)(20) of Regulation Z.

(7) “Regulation Z” means any rule,
 regulation, or interpretation promulgated by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
 under the federal Truth in Lending Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.), and any interpretation or approval issued by an official or employee of the Federal Reserve System duly authorized by the director of the bureau under the Truth in Lending Act, as amended, to issue interpretations or approvals.

(8) “Security interest” has the meaning set forth in Section 1026.2(a)(25) of Regulation Z.

(9) “Supervised financial organization” means a state or federally
 regulated bank, savings association, savings bank, or credit union, or a subsidiary of any of the above.

(10) “Unsecured” means that the supervised financial organization is not granted a security interest in personal or real property under the consumer credit agreement.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the definitions contained in this section shall control transactions governed by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 11.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.

(a) A supervised financial organization or charge card issuer may not charge more than any of the following amounts:

(1) If set forth in the consumer credit or charge card agreement, one of the following fees:

(A) Seven dollars ($7) with respect to any monthly billing cycle as a late payment charge on the minimum payment due that is not paid within five days after the date the payment is due.

(B) Ten dollars ($10) with respect to any monthly billing cycle as a late payment charge on the minimum payment due that is not paid within 10 days after the date the payment is due.

(C) Fifteen dollars ($15) with respect to any monthly billing cycle as a late payment charge on the minimum payment due that is not paid within 15 days after the date the payment is due.

(2) In lieu of the fee permitted by paragraph (1), if the consumer has already incurred two late payment fees during the preceding 12-month period, the fee charged may be no more than ten dollars ($10) with respect to any monthly billing cycle as a late payment charge on the minimum payment due that is not paid within five days after the date the payment is due.

(3) Ten dollars ($10) with
respect to any charge that causes the outstanding balance to exceed the credit limit by five hundred dollars ($500) or 120 percent, whichever is less. No overlimit fee may be charged unless the charge causes the outstanding balance to exceed the credit limit by five hundred dollars ($500) or 120 percent, whichever is less. Not more than one overlimit charge may be assessed with respect to any monthly billing cycle.

(b) In addition to imposing a fee for any late payment or overlimit as authorized by subdivision (a), a supervised financial organization may assess a finance charge at the rates set forth in the consumer credit agreement on the outstanding balance, which may include any late payment or overlimit fee charged on a prior billing statement.

(c) Whenever a consumer fails to make a minimum payment on or before the due date specified in the billing statement, plus the
applicable late payment grace period, a late payment fee may be assessed by the supervised financial organization or charge card issuer. A supervised financial organization or charge card issuer may impose no more than one late payment fee with respect to any monthly billing cycle. All payments by the consumer shall be applied by a supervised financial organization to satisfaction of scheduled payments in the order that they become due. A charge card issuer shall apply all payments made by the consumer to satisfaction of unpaid amounts in the order that they become due.

(d) A supervised financial organization shall provide a minimum number of days between the monthly billing statement date and the date upon which the minimum payment is due, exclusive of the applicable late payment grace period provided for in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and a charge card issuer shall provide a minimum number of days between the monthly billing statement
date and the date upon which the applicable late payment grace period provided for in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) begins to run, of at least:

(1) Twenty-three days, on an average basis over a calendar year or other consecutive 12-month period, for any organization or issuer charging the fee authorized by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) Twenty days, on an average basis over a calendar year or other consecutive 12-month period, for any organization or issuer charging the fee authorized by subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(e) (1) The applicable late payment grace period and fee shall be disclosed in the consumer credit agreement. The late payment grace period shall be disclosed in the consumer credit or charge card agreement but need not be
disclosed in any monthly or other billing statement. The amount and conditions for imposition of any fee for overlimit activity shall also be disclosed in the consumer credit or charge card agreement.

(2) If a consumer credit or charge card agreement contains a provision for a late payment fee or overlimit fee, each monthly or other billing statement shall disclose the amount of the late payment and overlimit fee and the date the minimum payment is due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1079, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.

(a) (1) Upon the request of a person who has obtained a police report pursuant to Section 530.6 of the Penal Code, a supervised financial organization shall provide to the person, or to a law enforcement officer specified by the person, copies of all application forms or application information containing the person’s name, address, or other identifying information pertaining to the application filed with the supervised financial organization by an unauthorized person in violation of Section 530.5 of the Penal Code.

(2) Before providing the person with copies pursuant to paragraph (1), the supervised financial organization shall inform the requesting person of the categories of identifying information that the unauthorized person used to complete the application, and shall require the requesting person to provide identifying information in those categories and a copy of the police report.

(3) The supervised financial organization shall provide copies of all forms and information required by this section, without charge, within 10 business days of receipt of the person’s request and submission of the required copy of the police report and identifying information.

(b) (1) Before a supervised financial organization provides copies to a law enforcement officer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the
supervised financial organization may require the requesting person to provide them with a signed and dated statement by which the person does all of the following:

(A) Authorizes disclosure for a stated period.

(B) Specifies the name of the agency or department to which the disclosure is authorized.

(C) Identifies the type of records that the person authorizes to be disclosed.

(2) The supervised financial organization shall include in the statement to be signed by the requesting person a notice that the person has the right at any time to revoke the authorization.

(c) As used in this section, “law enforcement officer” means a peace officer as defined by Section 830.1 of the Penal
Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 493, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.4. CALIFORNIA FINANCIAL INFORMATION PRIVACY ACT [4050. - 4060.]

4050.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Financial Information Privacy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 4060.)
-------------------------------------------

4051.

(a) The Legislature intends for financial institutions to provide their consumers notice and meaningful choice about how consumers’ nonpublic personal information is shared or sold by their financial institutions.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting the California Financial Information Privacy Act to afford persons greater privacy protections than those provided in Public Law 106-102, the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, and that this
 division be interpreted to be consistent with that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 4060.)
-------------------------------------------

4051.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The California Constitution protects the privacy of California citizens from unwarranted intrusions into their private and personal lives.

(2) Federal banking legislation, known as the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, which breaks down restrictions on affiliation among different types of financial institutions, increases the likelihood
 that the personal financial information of California residents will be widely shared among, between, and within companies.

(3) The policies intended to protect financial privacy imposed by the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act are inadequate to meet the privacy concerns of California residents.

(4) Because of the limitations of these federal policies, the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act explicitly permits states to enact privacy protections that are stronger than those provided in federal law.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this division:

(1) To ensure that Californians have the ability to control the disclosure of what the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act calls nonpublic personal information.

(2) To achieve that control for California consumers by requiring that financial institutions that want to share information with third parties and unrelated companies seek and acquire the affirmative consent of California consumers prior to sharing the information.

(3) To further achieve that control for California consumers by providing consumers with the ability to prevent the sharing of financial information among affiliated companies through a simple opt-out mechanism via a clear and understandable notice provided to the consumer.

(4) To provide, to the maximum extent possible, consistent with the purposes cited above, a level playing field among types and sizes of businesses consistent with the objective of providing consumers control over their nonpublic personal information, including providing that those financial institutions with limited affiliate
 relationships may enter into agreements with other financial institutions as provided in this division, and providing that the different business models of differing financial institutions are treated in ways that provide consistent consumer control over information-sharing practices.

(5) To adopt to the maximum extent feasible, consistent with the purposes cited above, definitions consistent with federal law, so that in particular there is no change in the ability of businesses to carry out normal processes of commerce for transactions voluntarily entered into by consumers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 4060.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.

For the purposes of this division:

(a) “Nonpublic personal information” means personally identifiable financial information (1) provided by a consumer to a financial institution, (2) resulting from any transaction with the consumer or any service performed for the consumer, or (3) otherwise obtained by the financial institution. Nonpublic personal information does not include publicly available information that the financial institution has a reasonable basis to believe is
 lawfully made available to the general public from (1) federal, state, or local government records, (2) widely distributed media, or (3) disclosures to the general public that are required to be made by federal, state, or local law. Nonpublic personal information shall include any list, description, or other grouping of consumers, and publicly available information pertaining to them, that is derived using any nonpublic personal information other than publicly available information, but shall not include any list, description, or other grouping of consumers, and publicly available information pertaining to them, that is derived without using any nonpublic personal information.

(b) “Personally identifiable financial information” means information (1) that a consumer provides to a financial institution to obtain a product or service from the financial institution, (2) about a consumer resulting from any transaction involving a product or service
 between the financial institution and a consumer, or (3) that the financial institution otherwise obtains about a consumer in connection with providing a product or service to that consumer. Any personally identifiable information is financial if it was obtained by a financial institution in connection with providing a financial product or service to a consumer. Personally identifiable financial information includes all of the following:

(1) Information a consumer provides to a financial institution on an application to obtain a loan, credit card, or other financial product or service.

(2) Account balance information, payment history, overdraft history, and credit or debit card purchase information.

(3) The fact that an individual is or has been a consumer of a financial institution or has obtained a financial
 product or service from a financial institution.

(4) Any information about a financial institution’s consumer if it is disclosed in a manner that indicates that the individual is or has been the financial institution’s consumer.

(5) Any information that a consumer provides to a financial institution or that a financial institution or its agent otherwise obtains in connection with collecting on a loan or servicing a loan.

(6) Any personally identifiable financial information collected through an Internet cookie or an information collecting device from a Web server.

(7) Information from a consumer report.

(c) “Financial institution” means any institution the business of which is engaging in
 financial activities as described in Section 1843(k) of Title 12 of the United States Code and doing business in this state. An institution that is not significantly engaged in financial activities is not a financial institution. The term “financial institution” does not include any institution that is primarily engaged in providing hardware, software, or interactive services, provided that it does not act as a debt collector, as defined in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1692a, or engage in activities for which the institution is required to acquire a charter, license, or registration from a state or federal governmental banking, insurance, or securities agency. The term “financial institution” does not include the Federal Agricultural Mortgage Corporation or any entity chartered and operating under the Farm Credit Act of 1971 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2001 et seq.), provided that the entity does not sell or transfer nonpublic personal information to an affiliate or a nonaffiliated third party. The term “financial institution” does
 not include institutions chartered by Congress specifically to engage in a proposed or actual securitization, secondary market sale, including sales of servicing rights, or similar transactions related to a transaction of the consumer, as long as those institutions do not sell or transfer nonpublic personal information to a nonaffiliated third party. The term “financial institution” does not include any provider of professional services, or any wholly owned affiliate thereof, that is prohibited by rules of professional ethics and applicable law from voluntarily disclosing confidential client information without the consent of the client. The term “financial institution” does not include any person licensed as a dealer under Article 1 (commencing with Section 11700) of Chapter 4 of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code that enters into contracts for the installment sale or lease of motor vehicles pursuant to the requirements of Chapter 2B (commencing with Section 2981) or 2D (commencing with Section 2985.7) of Title
 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code and assigns substantially all of those contracts to financial institutions within 30 days.

(d) “Affiliate” means any entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, another entity, but does not include a joint employee of the entity and the affiliate. A franchisor, including any affiliate thereof, shall be deemed an affiliate of the franchisee for purposes of this division.

(e) “Nonaffiliated third party” means any entity that is not an affiliate of, or related by common ownership or affiliated by corporate control with, the financial institution, but does not include a joint employee of that institution and a third party.

(f) “Consumer” means an individual resident of this state, or that individual’s legal representative, who obtains or has
 obtained from a financial institution a financial product or service to be used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. For purposes of this division, an individual resident of this state is someone whose last known mailing address, other than an Armed Forces Post Office or Fleet Post Office address, as shown in the records of the financial institution, is located in this state. For purposes of this division, an individual is not a consumer of a financial institution solely because he or she is (1) a participant or beneficiary of an employee benefit plan that a financial institution administers or sponsors, or for which the financial institution acts as a trustee, insurer, or fiduciary, (2) covered under a group or blanket insurance policy or group annuity contract issued by the financial institution, (3) a beneficiary in a workers’ compensation plan, (4) a beneficiary of a trust for which the financial institution is a trustee, or (5) a person who has designated the financial institution as
 trustee for a trust, provided that the financial institution provides all required notices and rights required by this division to the plan sponsor, group or blanket insurance policyholder, or group annuity contractholder.

(g) “Control” means (1) ownership or power to vote 25 percent or more of the outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a company, acting through one or more persons, (2) control in any manner over the election of a majority of the directors, or of individuals exercising similar functions, or (3) the power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling influence over the management or policies of a company. However, for purposes of the application of the definition of control as it relates to credit unions, a credit union has a controlling influence over the management or policies of a credit union service organization (CUSO), as that term is defined by state or federal law or regulation, if the CUSO is at
 least 67 percent owned by credit unions. For purposes of the application of the definition of control to a financial institution subject to regulation by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, a person who owns beneficially, either directly or through one or more controlled companies, more than 25 percent of the voting securities of a company is presumed to control the company, and a person who does not own more than 25 percent of the voting securities of a company is presumed not to control the company, and a presumption regarding control may be rebutted by evidence, but in the case of an investment company, the presumption shall continue until the United States Securities and Exchange Commission makes a decision to the contrary according to the procedures described in Section 2(a)(9) of the federal Investment Company Act of 1940.

(h) “Necessary to effect, administer, or enforce” means the following:

(1) The disclosure is required, or is a usual, appropriate, or acceptable method to carry out the transaction or the product or service business of which the transaction is a part, and record or service or maintain the consumer’s account in the ordinary course of providing the financial service or financial product, or to administer or service benefits or claims relating to the transaction or the product or service business of which it is a part, and includes the following:

(A) Providing the consumer or the consumer’s agent or broker with a confirmation, statement, or other record of the transaction, or information on the status or value of the financial service or financial product.

(B) The accrual or recognition of incentives, discounts, or bonuses associated with the transaction or communications to eligible existing
 consumers of the financial institution regarding the availability of those incentives, discounts, and bonuses that are provided by the financial institution or another party.

(C) In the case of a financial institution that has issued a credit account bearing the name of a company primarily engaged in retail sales or a name proprietary to a company primarily engaged in retail sales, the financial institution providing the retailer with nonpublic personal information as follows:

(i) Providing the retailer, or licensees or contractors of the retailer that provide products or services in the name of the retailer and under a contract with the retailer, with the names and addresses of the consumers in whose name the account is held and a record of the purchases made using the credit account from a business establishment, including a Web site or catalog, bearing the brand name of the
 retailer.

(ii) Where the credit account can only be used for transactions with the retailer or affiliates of that retailer that are also primarily engaged in retail sales, providing the retailer, or licensees or contractors of the retailer that provide products or services in the name of the retailer and under a contract with the retailer, with nonpublic personal information concerning the credit account, in connection with the offering or provision of the products or services of the retailer and those licensees or contractors.

(2) The disclosure is required or is one of the lawful or appropriate methods to enforce the rights of the financial institution or of other persons engaged in carrying out the financial transaction or providing the product or service.

(3) The disclosure is required, or is a usual,
 appropriate, or acceptable method for insurance underwriting or the placement of insurance products by licensed agents and brokers with authorized insurance companies at the consumer’s request, for reinsurance, stop loss insurance, or excess loss insurance purposes, or for any of the following purposes as they relate to a consumer’s insurance:

(A) Account administration.

(B) Reporting, investigating, or preventing fraud or material misrepresentation.

(C) Processing premium payments.

(D) Processing insurance claims.

(E) Administering insurance benefits, including utilization review activities.

(F) Participating in research
 projects.

(G) As otherwise required or specifically permitted by federal or state law.

(4) The disclosure is required, or is a usual, appropriate, or acceptable method, in connection with the following:

(A) The authorization, settlement, billing, processing, clearing, transferring, reconciling, or collection of amounts charged, debited, or otherwise paid using a debit, credit or other payment card, check, or account number, or by other payment means.

(B) The transfer of receivables, accounts, or interests therein.

(C) The audit of debit, credit, or other payment information.

(5) The disclosure is required in a transaction
 covered by the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.) in order to offer settlement services prior to the close of escrow (as those services are defined in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 2602), provided that (A) the nonpublic personal information is disclosed for the sole purpose of offering those settlement services and (B) the nonpublic personal information disclosed is limited to that necessary to enable the financial institution to offer those settlement services in that transaction.

(i) “Financial product or service” means any product or service that a financial holding company could offer by engaging in an activity that is financial in nature or incidental to a financial activity under subsection (k) of Section 1843 of Title 12 of the United States Code (the United States Bank Holding Company Act of 1956). Financial service includes a financial institution’s evaluation or brokerage of information that the financial
 institution collects in connection with a request or an application from a consumer for a financial product or service.

(j) “Clear and conspicuous” means that a notice is reasonably understandable and designed to call attention to the nature and significance of the information contained in the notice.

(k) “Widely distributed media” means media available to the general public and includes a telephone book, a television or radio program, a newspaper, or a Web site that is available to the general public on an unrestricted basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 4060.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.5.

Except as provided in Sections 4053, 4054.6, and 4056, a financial institution shall not sell, share, transfer, or otherwise disclose nonpublic personal information to or with any nonaffiliated third parties without the explicit prior consent of the consumer to whom the nonpublic personal information relates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 4060.)
-------------------------------------------

4053.

(a) (1) A financial institution shall not disclose to, or share a consumer’s nonpublic personal information with, any nonaffiliated third party as prohibited by Section 4052.5, unless the financial institution has obtained a consent acknowledgment from the consumer that complies with paragraph (2) that authorizes the financial institution to disclose or share the nonpublic personal information. Nothing in this section
 shall prohibit or otherwise apply to the disclosure of nonpublic personal information as allowed in Section 4056. A financial institution shall not discriminate against or deny an otherwise qualified consumer a financial product or a financial service because the consumer has not provided consent pursuant to this subdivision and Section 4052.5 to authorize the financial institution to disclose or share nonpublic personal information pertaining to him or her with any nonaffiliated third party. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a financial institution from denying a consumer a financial product or service if the financial institution could not provide the product or service to a consumer without the consent to disclose the consumer’s nonpublic personal information required by this subdivision and Section 4052.5, and the consumer has failed to provide consent. A financial institution shall not be liable for failing to offer products and services to a consumer solely because that consumer has failed to
 provide consent pursuant to this subdivision and Section 4052.5 and the financial institution could not offer the product or service without the consent to disclose the consumer’s nonpublic personal information required by this subdivision and Section 4052.5, and the consumer has failed to provide consent. Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit a financial institution from offering incentives or discounts to elicit a specific response to the notice.

(2) A financial institution shall utilize a form, statement, or writing to obtain consent to disclose nonpublic personal information to nonaffiliated third parties as required by Section 4052.5 and this subdivision. The form, statement, or writing shall meet all of the following criteria:

(A) The form, statement, or writing is a separate document, not attached to any other document.

(B) The form, statement, or writing is dated and signed by the consumer.

(C) The form, statement, or writing clearly and conspicuously discloses that by signing, the consumer is consenting to the disclosure to nonaffiliated third parties of nonpublic personal information pertaining to the consumer.

(D) The form, statement, or writing clearly and conspicuously discloses (i) that the consent will remain in effect until revoked or modified by the consumer; (ii) that the consumer may revoke the consent at any time; and (iii) the procedure for the consumer to revoke consent.

(E) The form, statement, or writing clearly and conspicuously informs the consumer that (i) the financial institution will maintain the document or a true and correct copy; (ii) the consumer